Tennessee, session 114, HB1465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 87 of the Private Acts of 1973, as amended by Chapter 31 of the
Private Acts of 2005, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting Section 3
and substituting:
SECTION 3. The County Assessor of Properties shall be entitled to a fee for the
issuance of each building permit. The fee for a building permit shall be the sum of fifty
cents ($0.50) per square foot for all buildings constructed, erected, or reconstructed. A
building permit shall not be required for a shed or barn, and no fee shall be collected.
Any provision regarding building permit fees in conflict with the building permit fee
prescribed by this section is repealed.
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of Union County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the
presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
HB1465
010522
- 1 -